North Carolina, session 2025, SB1081.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. Article I of the North Carolina Constitution is amended by adding a
new section to read:
"Sec. 39. Right to engage in farming and forestry.
The right of the people to engage in the cultivation of crops, the raising of livestock and
poultry, the production of dairy and apiary products, the harvesting of timber, and other practices
for the production of agricultural and forestry commodities is a valued and essential part of the
State's heritage and shall be forever preserved for the public good, subject only to laws enacted
by the General Assembly and rules adopted pursuant to authority granted by the General
Assembly."
SECTION 2. The amendment set out in Section 1 of this act shall be submitted to
the qualified voters of the State at a statewide general election to be held in November of 2026,
which election shall be conducted under the laws then governing elections in the State. Ballots,
voting systems, or both may be used in accordance with Chapter 163A of the General Statutes.
The question to be used in the voting systems and ballots shall be:
"[ ] FOR [ ] AGAINST
Constitutional amendment protecting the right of the people to engage in farming and
forestry."
SECTION 3. The State Board of Elections shall certify the results of the referendum
conducted under Section 2 of this act. If a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of
the amendment set out in Section 1 of this act, the Secretary of State shall enroll the amendment
among the permanent records of that office. If a majority of votes cast on the question are against
the amendment set out in Section 1 of this act, the amendment shall have no effect.
SECTION 4. If the certification from the State Board of Elections under Section 3
of this act reflects that a majority of votes cast on the question are in favor of the amendment set
out in Section 1 of this act, the amendment set out in Section 1 of this act is effective upon
certification.
SECTION 5. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
*S1081-v-1*